Illinois, session 104th, SB2530.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department 8of Children and Family Services:9ENTIRE AGENCY10PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND11  For Personal Services...........................423,429,30012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security.................................32,392,40014  For Contractual Services.........................43,021,50015  For Travel..........................................994,80016  For Commodities.....................................790,00017  For Printing........................................387,40018  For Equipment.....................................6,323,90019  For Electronic Data Processing...................79,378,30020  For Telecommunication Services....................7,660,40021  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............759,50022    Total                                        $595,137,500   SB2530- 2 -OMB104 00012 TTH 10012 b1PAYABLE FROM THE DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND2  For Travel........................................7,038,800 3    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 5purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department 6of Children and Family Services:7CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION8PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND9  For Attorney General Representation10   on Child Welfare Litigation Issues.................745,00011PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND12  For Information Technology.......................88,501,80013PAYABLE FROM DCFS SPECIAL PURPOSES TRUST FUND14  For Expenditures of Private Funds15   for Child Welfare Improvements...................2,794,500 16    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department 19of Children and Family Services:20REGULATION AND QUALITY CONTROL21PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND22  For Child Death Review Teams........................106,400 23    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much   SB2530- 3 -OMB104 00012 TTH 10012 b1thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 2the Department of Children and Family Services:3CHILD WELFARE4PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND5  For Targeted Case Management.....................12,659,8006PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND7  For Independent Living Initiative................11,706,4008PAYABLE FROM DCFS FEDERAL PROJECTS FUND9  For Federal Child Welfare Projects..................816,600 10    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 12the Department of Children and Family Services:13CHILD PROTECTION14PAYABLE FROM DCFS FEDERAL PROJECTS FUND15  For Federal Grant Awards.........................15,000,000 16    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 18the Department of Children and Family Services:19BUDGET, LEGAL AND COMPLIANCE20PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND21  For Refunds..........................................11,20022PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND23  For Title IV-E Enhancement........................4,228,80024  For SSI Reimbursement.............................1,513,300  SB2530- 4 -OMB104 00012 TTH 10012 b1    Total                                          $5,742,100 2    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 4the Department of Children and Family Services for payments 5for care of children served by the Department of Children and 6Family Services:7GRANTS-IN-AID8REGIONAL OFFICES9PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND10  For Youth in Transition Program...................2,708,60011  For Counseling and Auxiliary Services............19,021,10012  For Court Appointed Special Advocates.............4,221,50013  For Cash Assistance and Housing14   Locator Service to Families in the15   Class Defined in the Norman Consent Order........3,319,40016  For Assisting in the Development17   of Children's Advocacy Centers...................2,171,40018  For Family Preservation Services.................40,375,30019  For Foster Homes and Specialized20   Foster Care and Prevention,21   including prior years' costs...................422,398,30022  For Purchase of Adoption and23   Guardianship Services, including 24   prior years' costs.............................160,791,90025  For Institution and Group Home Care and  SB2530- 5 -OMB104 00012 TTH 10012 b1   Prevention, including prior years' costs.......261,365,6002  For Services Associated with the Foster3   Care Initiative..................................6,212,7004    Total                                        $922,585,8005PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND6  For Counseling and Auxiliary Services............19,269,1007  For Children's Personal and8   Physical Maintenance.............................5,471,8009  For Court Appointed Special Advocates.............5,344,90010  For Cash Assistance and Housing Locator11   Services to Families in the12   Class Defined in the Norman13   Consent Order....................................6,071,30014  For Assisting in the development15   of Children's Advocacy Centers...................5,290,60016  For Psychological Assessments17   Including Operations and18   Administrative Expenses..........................3,463,50019  For Family Preservation Services.................44,125,30020  For Family Centered Services Initiative..........17,487,30021  For Foster Homes and Specialized22   Foster Care and Prevention,23   including prior years' costs...................290,437,00024  For Purchase of Adoption and 25   Guardianship Services, including prior26   years' costs....................................50,160,100  SB2530- 6 -OMB104 00012 TTH 10012 b1  For Institution and Group Home Care and2   Prevention, including prior years' costs.......125,900,2003  For Services Associated with the Foster4   Care Initiative..................................1,705,6005    Total                                        $574,726,700 6    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 8the Department of Children and Family Services for:9GRANTS-IN-AID10CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION11PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND12  For Department Scholarship Program...............16,014,300 13    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 15the Department of Children and Family Services for:16GRANTS-IN-AID17CHILD PROTECTION18PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND19  For Protective/Family Maintenance20   Day Care........................................62,236,60021  For Residential Construction Services Grants, or22   for deposit into the DCFS Special Purposes23   Trust Fund.........................................900,000   SB2530- 7 -OMB104 00012 TTH 10012 b1    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 3the Department of Children and Family Services for:4GRANTS-IN-AID5BUDGET, LEGAL AND COMPLIANCE6PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND7  For Tort Claims......................................66,0008PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND9  For all expenditures related to the10   collection and distribution of Title IV-E11   Reimbursement....................................3,000,00012  For expenses related to litigation................4,220,000 13    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 15the Department of Children and Family Services for:16GRANTS-IN-AID17CLINICAL SERVICES18PAYABLE FROM DCFS CHILDREN'S SERVICES FUND19   For Foster Care and Adoptive Care Training......18,838,600 20    Section 55. The sum of $100,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 23made for such purpose in Article 51, Section 55 of Public Act 24103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Build   SB2530- 8 -OMB104 00012 TTH 10012 b1Illinois Bond Fund to the Department of Children and Family 2Services for grants and administrative expenses associated 3with Level of Care Support Services, including prior years' 4costs. 5    Section 60. No contract shall be entered into or 6obligation incurred for any expenditures from the 7reappropriation made in Section 55 until after the purposes 8and amounts have been approved in writing by the Governor. 9    Section 65. The sum of $30,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the DCFS Special 11Purposes Trust Fund to the Department of Children and Family 12Services for grants and administrative expenses associated 13with the Level of Care Support Services, including prior 14years' costs. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162025.